Utah statutes.
10-9a-704.   Time to appeal.

(1)  The municipality shall enact an ordinance establishing a reasonable time of not less than 10 days to appeal to an appeal authority a written decision issued by a land use authority.

(2)  In the absence of an ordinance establishing a reasonable time to appeal, an adversely affected party shall have 10 calendar days to appeal to an appeal authority a written decision issued by a land use authority.



Amended by Chapter 240, 2006 General Session

